Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Penalties Under Certain Programs Administered by the Mississippi Development Authority for Entities that are Convicted of Hiring Illegal Immigrants

§ 57-1-371.
Ineligibility for loans or grants under Sections 1 through 57 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session, of entities that are convicted of hiring illegal immigrants; repayment of assistance received under Sections 1 through 57 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session, by entities that are convicted of hiring illegal immigrants.

Any business, enterprise or other entity that is criminally convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants shall be ineligible to receive any loan, grant or other form of assistance made available under Sections 1 through 57 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session. Any business, enterprise or other entity that receives any loan, grant or other form of assistance made available under Sections 1 through 57 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session, and is criminally convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants shall repay the full amount of such loan, grant or other form of assistance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 57-1-373.
Ineligibility for certain forms of assistance under Sections 1 through 7 of Chapter 2, Laws of 2006, First Extraordinary Session, of entities that are convicted of hiring illegal immigrants; repayment of assistance received under Sections 1 through 7 of Chapter 2, Laws of 2006, First Extraordinary Session, by entities that are convicted of hiring illegal immigrants.

No business, enterprise or other entity that is, or has ever been, criminally convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants that develops or is located in a “project” as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) shall be eligible to receive:

Any funds provided or derived from the issuance of any bonds under Sections 1 through 7 of Chapter 2, Laws of 2006, First Extraordinary Session.

Any loan, grant or other form of assistance that may be made available under Sections 1 through 7 of Chapter 2, Laws of 2006, First Extraordinary Session; or

Any funds, tax credit or other form of assistance that may be made available as an incentive payment under Sections 1 through 7 of Chapter 2, Laws of 2006, First Extraordinary Session.

If a business, enterprise or other entity that develops or is located in a “project” as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) has received funds or assistance as described in paragraphs (a) through (c) of subsection (1) of this section, and thereafter is convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants, then the business, enterprise or other entity shall repay the full amount of the funds or assistance received. The repayment shall be certified by the State Treasurer, who shall deposit such amounts into the specific special fund in the State Treasury from which the funds were awarded, or, in the case of incentive payments under Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5, into the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Sept. 13, 2006).